District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-509

Lessee’s rights on improper delivery; rightful rejection.

(a)

Subject to the provisions of § 28:2A-510 on default in installment lease contracts, if the goods or the tender or delivery fail in any respect to conform to the lease contract, the lessee may reject or accept the goods or accept any commercial unit or units and reject the rest of the goods.

(b)

Rejection of goods is ineffective unless it is within a reasonable time after tender or delivery of the goods and the lessee seasonably notifies the lessor.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830
This section is referenced in § 28:2A-508 and § 28:2A-515.
1981 Ed., § 28:2A-509.

Uniform Statutory Source:Sections 2-601 and 2-602(1).

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology.

Definitional Cross References: “Commercial unit”. Section 2A-103(1)(c).

“Conforming”. Section 2A-103(1)(d).

“Delivery”. Section 1-201(14).

“Goods”. Section 2A-103(1)(h).

“Installment lease contract”. Section 2A-103(1)(i).

“Lease contract”. Section 2A-103(1)(l).

“Lessee”. Section 2A-103(1)(n).

“Lessor”. Section 2A-103(1)(p).

“Notifies”. Section 1-201(26).

“Reasonable time”. Section 1-204(1) and (2).

“Rights”. Section 1-201(36).

“Seasonably”. Section 1-204(3).